Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-107
Books; labeling.

It shall be the duty of the librarian to cause each book to be labeled with a printed or stamped label containing the words Nebraska State Library, and also to write the same words on the thirtieth page of each volume.

Laws 1871, § 12, p. 54;

R.S.1913, § 3785;

C.S.1922, § 3178;

C.S.1929, § 51-107;

R.S.1943, § 51-107.